Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 20

Tennessee Allocation Plan for Private Activity Bonds

9-20-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Tennessee Allocation Plan for Private Activity Bonds.”

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 1; 1987, ch. 57, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 6 provided that for the purposes of this chapter, any issue of private activity bonds with respect to which the commissioner has issued a letter of reservation for calendar year 1985 pursuant to the authority granted by Executive Order 62 promulgated August 7, 1984, shall be deemed approved under this chapter.

Cross-References. Industrial development corporation bond issues, title 7, ch. 53, part 3.

Student loans, title 49, ch. 4.

9-20-102. Legislative purpose — Reassignment of allocations.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a procedure for allocating the state's private activity bond authority among governmental units in the state having the authority to issue bonds under the Tax Reform Act of 1986.

Allocations to local governments may be reassigned for issuance to all boards and authorities authorized to issue bonds on behalf of governmental units.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 2; 1987, ch. 57, §§ 2-5.

9-20-103. Authority for allocating state's bond authority.

There is hereby created in the department of economic and community development the authority for the commissioner, under this chapter, to allocate the state's bond authority among governmental units having authority to issue bonds.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 3.

9-20-104. Preparation, distribution and contents of allocation plans.

The commissioner shall, prior to January 1 of each year, prepare and distribute an allocation plan for bonds that meets the following goals:

Provides equal access to the state bond authority for large cities, small towns and rural areas; and

Provides the most benefit to the state from the bond authority available to it.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 4.

9-20-105. Reports.

Prior to January 31 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the general assembly on the administration of the bond allocation program. This report shall contain, but not be limited to, the following information about bond issues approved and disapproved:

Amount;

Purpose; and

Location.

The commissioner may include in this report any additional information that will assist the general assembly in evaluating the administration of the bond allocation program.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Multi-family housing project not “public works project”, OAG 98-104, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (6/11/98).

9-20-106. Administration of part.

This chapter shall be administered under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1985, ch. 237, § 7.